Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.382

Child care organizations—Qualifications for services.

In order to qualify for services under RCW 41.04.380, state employee child care organizations shall be organized as nonprofit under chapter 24.03A RCW.

[ 2021 c 176 s 5218; 1993 c 194 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 176: See note following RCW 24.03A.005.